Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1273
Nonparty; discovery; subpoena; procedure.

When the discovery rules promulgated by the Supreme Court authorize discovery from a nonparty without a deposition, a subpoena shall be issued by the clerk of the court before whom the action is pending upon request of a party. An attorney as an officer of the court may also issue and sign such a subpoena on behalf of a court in which the attorney is authorized to practice. The subpoena shall be served in the time and manner required by the discovery rules. Such discovery rules shall not be construed to permit discovery by subpoena if the information is protected by statute or if that procedure conflicts with any other statute.

Laws 2001, LB 489, § 2.